Maine, session 132, LD118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§1, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
1. Certified candidate. "Certified candidate" means a candidate running for
Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, sheriff or district attorney who chooses
to participate in the Maine Clean Election Act and who is certified as a Maine Clean
Election Act candidate under section 1125, subsection 5.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§5, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
5. Nonparticipating candidate. "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate
running for Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, sheriff or district attorney
who does not choose to participate in the Maine Clean Election Act and who is not seeking
to be certified as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate under section 1125, subsection 5.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§6, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
6. Participating candidate. "Participating candidate" means a candidate who is
running for Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, sheriff or district attorney
who is seeking to be certified as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate under section 1125,
subsection 5.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §1122, sub-§8, ¶B, as amended by PL 2009, c. 286, §5, is
further amended to read:
B. For State Senate or, State House of Representatives, sheriff or district attorney
participating candidates, the qualifying period begins January 1st of the election year
and ends at 5:00 p.m. on April 20th of that election year or the next business day
following April 20th if the office of the commission is closed on April 20th.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §1123, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended to read:
§1123. Alternative campaign financing option
This chapter establishes an alternative campaign financing option available to
candidates running for Governor, State Senator and, State Representative, sheriff and
district attorney. This alternative campaign financing option is available to candidates
running for Governor, State Senator and State Representative for elections to be held
beginning in the year 2000. This alternative campaign financing option is available to
candidates running for sheriff and district attorney for elections to be held beginning in the
year 2028. The commission shall administer this Act and the fund. Candidates
participating in the Maine Clean Election Act must shall also comply with all other
applicable election and campaign laws and regulations.
Sec. 6. 21-A MRSA §1124, sub-§1, as enacted by IB 1995, c. 1, §17, is amended
to read:
1. Established. The Maine Clean Election Fund is established to finance the election
campaigns of certified Maine Clean Election Act candidates running for Governor, State
Senator and, State Representative, sheriff or district attorney and to pay administrative and
Page 1 - 132LR0057(01)

412 enforcement costs of the commission related to this Act. The fund is a special, dedicated,
423 nonlapsing fund and any interest generated by the fund is credited to the fund. The
434 commission shall administer the fund.
Sec. 7. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§2-C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 132, §10, is
amended to read:
2-C. Change in campaign financing. If a candidate has accepted contributions as a
candidate for Governor, State Senator or, State Representative, sheriff or district attorney
that are not seed money contributions as defined in section 1122, subsection 9 or do not
comply with the seed money restrictions in subsections 2 and 2‑A, the candidate is
ineligible for certification in the same election cycle.
Sec. 8. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§5, as amended by IB 2015, c. 1, §20, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The executive director shall certify a candidate complying with the requirements of this
section as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate as soon as possible after final submittal of
qualifying contributions and other supporting documents required under subsection 4 but
no later than 3 business days for legislative, sheriff and district attorney candidates and 5
business days for gubernatorial candidates. The executive director may take additional
time if further investigation is necessary to verify compliance with this Act as long as the
commission notifies the candidate regarding the anticipated schedule for conclusion of the
investigation. A candidate or other interested person may appeal the decision of the
executive director to the members of the commission in accordance with subsection 14.
Sec. 9. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§7-B, ¶B, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 1, §23, is
amended to read:
B. For legislative, sheriff and district attorney candidates, any supplemental general
election distributions made pursuant to subsections 8‑C and 8‑D must be made within
3 business days of certification by the commission of the required number of additional
qualifying contributions.
Sec. 10. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§8-E, ¶B, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 1, §25, is
amended to read:
B. For legislative, sheriff and district attorney candidates, no earlier than January 1st
of the election year and no later than 3 weeks before election day.
Sec. 11. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§8-F, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 1, §25, is
amended to read:
8-F. Amount of distributions. On December 1st of each even-numbered year the
commission shall review and adjust the distribution amounts in subsections 8‑B to 8‑D and
the distribution amounts for sheriff and district attorney candidates established by the
commission based on the Consumer Price Index as reported by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. If an adjustment is warranted by the
Consumer Price Index, the distribution amounts must be adjusted, rounded to the nearest
amount divisible by $25. When making adjustments under this subsection, the commission
may not change the number of qualifying contributions or additional qualifying
contributions required to trigger an initial distribution or an increment of supplemental
distribution. The commission shall post information about the distribution amounts
Page 2 - 132LR0057(01)

414 including the date of any adjustment on its publicly accessible website and include this
425 information with any publication to be used as a guide for candidates.
Sec. 12. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§10, as amended by IB 2015, c. 1, §26, is further
amended to read:
10. Candidate not enrolled in a party. An unenrolled candidate for the Legislature,
sheriff or district attorney who submits the required number of qualifying contributions and
other required documents under subsection 4 by 5:00 p.m. on April 20th preceding the
primary election and who is certified is eligible for revenues from the fund in the same
amounts and at the same time as an uncontested primary election candidate and a general
election candidate as specified in subsections 7, 8‑C and 8‑D. Revenues for the general
election must be distributed to the candidate as specified in subsection 7. An unenrolled
candidate for Governor who submits the required number of qualifying contributions and
other required documents under subsection 4 by 5:00 p.m. on April 1st preceding the
primary election and who is certified is eligible for revenues from the fund in the same
amounts and at the same time as an uncontested primary election gubernatorial candidate
and a general election gubernatorial candidate as specified in subsections 7 and 8‑B.
Revenues for the general election must be distributed to the candidate for Governor as
specified in subsection 7.
Sec. 13. 21-A MRSA §1125, sub-§15 is enacted to read:
15. Terms of participation for sheriff and district attorney candidates. The
commission shall establish terms of participation for sheriff and district attorney candidates
that allow candidates to qualify and participate starting with the 2028 election cycle. The
terms of participation established by the commission must set forth the seed money
contribution limits, the number of qualifying contributions and the amount of revenue to
be distributed from the fund and the timing of such distributions. When establishing the
terms of participation, the commission shall consider the terms of participation for
gubernatorial and legislative candidates set forth in this chapter, including an assessment
of the difficulty of certification under this section and distribution amounts available to
participating Senate and House candidates and gubernatorial candidates relative to the
population of Senate and House districts and the State. The commission shall also consider
historical spending patterns for the various sheriff and district attorney races in contested
and uncontested primary and general elections, the population of the county or
prosecutorial district, the recent historical competitiveness of sheriff candidates for the
county and district attorney candidates for the prosecutorial district and any other factors
the commission determines to be consistent with the purposes of this chapter. The
commission may establish different terms of participation for sheriff candidates and district
attorney candidates. The commission may establish different terms of participation that
reasonably relate to differences in geographic area or population of counties for sheriff
candidates or prosecutorial districts for district attorney candidates within the State.
Sec. 14. 21-A MRSA §1126, as amended by PL 2023, c. 211, §5, is further amended
to read:
§1126. Commission to adopt rules
The commission shall adopt rules to ensure effective administration of this chapter.
These rules must include but may not be limited to procedures for obtaining qualifying
contributions, certification as a Maine Clean Election Act candidate, circumstances
Page 3 - 132LR0057(01)

416 involving special elections, recounts, collection of revenues for the fund, distribution of
427 fund revenue to certified candidates, return of unspent fund disbursements, disposition of
438 equipment purchased with clean election funds, terms of participation for sheriff and
449 district attorney candidates and compliance with the Maine Clean Election Act. Rules of
550 the commission required by this section are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
561 chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.